Mississippi statutes. Title 33. Military Affairs
Article 9. Appointment and Composition of Courts-Martial.

§ 33-13-175.
Who may convene general courts-martial.

In the state military forces not in federal service, general courts-martial may be convened by:

The Governor of the State of Mississippi; or

The Adjutant General; or

Any other general officer under such regulations as the Governor may promulgate.

HISTORY:
Former §33-13-201 [Codes, 1942, § 8529-23; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 23] repealed by Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 102, eff from and after July 1, 1981, amended and recodified as §33-13-175 by Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 25, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-177.
Who may convene special courts-martial.

In the state military forces not in federal service, the commanding officer of a garrison, fort, post, camp, air base, auxiliary air base or other place where troops are on duty, or of a division, brigade, regiment, wing, group, battalion, separate squadron, or other detached command, may convene special court-martial. Special courts-martial may also be convened by superior authority. When any such officer is an accuser, the court may be convened by superior competent authority if considered advisable by him.

HISTORY:
Former §33-13-203 [Codes, 1942, § 8529-24; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 24] repealed by Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 102, eff from and after July 1, 1981, amended and recodified as §33-13-177 by Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 26, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-179.
Who may convene summary courts-martial.

In the state military forces not in federal service, the commanding officer of a garrison, fort, post, camp, air base, auxiliary air base, or of a regiment, wing, group, battalion, detached squadron, or detached company or higher command, may convene a summary court-martial.

HISTORY:
Former §33-13-205 [Codes, 1942, § 8529-25; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 25] repealed by Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 102; Laws, 2017, ch. 354, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 33-13-181.
Who may serve on courts-martial.

Any commissioned officer of the state military forces in a duty status is eligible to serve on all courts-martial for the trial of any person who may lawfully be brought before such courts for trial.

Any warrant officer of the state military forces in a duty status is eligible to serve on general and special courts-martial for the trial of any person, other than a commissioned officer, who may lawfully be brought before such courts for trial.

Any enlisted member of the state military forces in a duty status who is not a member of the same unit as the accused is eligible to serve on general and special courts-martial for the trial of any enlisted member of the state military forces who may lawfully be brought before such courts for trial, but he shall serve as a member of a court only if, before the conclusion of a session called by the military judge under Section 33-13-207 [repealed] of this code prior to trial or, in the absence of such a session, before the court is assembled for the trial of the accused, the accused personally has requested in writing that enlisted members serve on it. After such a request, the accused may not be tried by a general or special court-martial the membership of which does not include enlisted members in a number comprising at least one-third (1/3) of the total membership of the court, unless eligible members cannot be obtained on account of physical conditions or military exigencies. If such members cannot be obtained, the court may be convened and the trial held without them, but the convening authority shall make a detailed written statement, to be appended to the record, stating why they could not be obtained.

In this subsection, the word “unit” means any regularly organized body of the state military forces comparable to company size.

When it can be avoided no person subject to this code may be tried by a court-martial any member of which is junior to him in rank or grade.

When convening a court-martial, the convening authority shall detail as members thereof such members of the state military forces as, in his opinion, are best qualified for the duty by reason of age, education, training, experience, length of service and judicial temperament. No member of the state military forces is eligible to serve as a member of a general or special court-martial when he is the accuser or a witness for the prosecution or has acted as investigating officer or as counsel in the same case.

HISTORY:
Former §33-13-207 [Codes, 1942, § 8529-26; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 26] repealed by Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 102, eff from and after July 1, 1981, amended and recodified as §33-13-181 by Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 28, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-183.
Military judge of a court-martial.

The authority convening a general or special court-martial shall, and subject to regulations issued by the Governor, the authority convening a summary court-martial may, detail a military judge. A military judge or a summary court officer shall preside over open sessions of the court-martial to which he has been detailed and shall be the approving authority over all pleas.

A military judge shall be a commissioned officer of the state military forces who is a member of the Judge Advocate General Corps, a member of the bar of a federal court and a member of the bar of the Supreme Court of the State of Mississippi and who is certified to be qualified for duty as a military judge by the State Judge Advocate of the state military forces. Any military judge qualified pursuant to 18 USCS 826 may be considered a military judge herein upon determination of need by the Adjutant General of the State of Mississippi.

The military judge of a general court-martial shall be designated by the State Judge Advocate, or his designee, for detail by the convening authority and, unless the court-martial was convened by the Governor or the Adjutant General, neither the convening authority nor any member of his staff shall prepare or review any report concerning the effectiveness, fitness or efficiency of the military judge so detailed, which relates to his performance of duty as a military judge.

No person is eligible to act as military judge in a case if he is the accuser or a witness for the prosecution or has acted as investigating officer or a counsel in the same case.

The military judge of a court-martial may not consult with the members of the court except in the presence of the trial counsel and defense counsel, nor may he vote with the members of the court in a panel case.

A military judge detailed to preside over a court-martial hereunder shall not be subject to any report by the convening authority or any member of his staff concerning the effectiveness, fitness or efficiency of that military judge so detailed, which relates to his performance of duty as a military judge.

All trial counsel, defense counsel, military judges, legal officers, summary court officers and any other person certified by the State Judge Advocate to perform legal functions under this code, shall be used interchangeably, as needed, among all of the state military forces.

HISTORY:
Former §33-13-209 [Codes, 1942, § 8529-27; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 27] repealed by Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 102; Laws, 2017, ch. 354, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 33-13-185.
Detail of trial counsel and defense counsel.

For each general, special and summary court-martial, the authority convening the court shall detail trial counsel and defense counsel and such assistants as he considers appropriate. No person who has acted as investigating officer, military judge or court member in any case may act later as trial counsel, assistant trial counsel or, unless expressly requested by the accused, as defense counsel, or assistant defense counsel in the same case. No person who has acted for the prosecution may act later in the same case for the defense, nor may any person who has acted for the defense act later in the same case for the prosecution.

Trial counsel and defense counsel detailed for any court-martial:

Must be licensed to practice law in the State of Mississippi; and

Must be certified as competent to perform such duties by the State Judge Advocate.

HISTORY:
Former §33-13-185 [Codes, 1942, § 8529-28; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 28] repealed by Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 102, eff from and after July 1, 1981, amended and recodified as §33-13-185 by Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 30; Laws, 1989, ch. 473, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 33-13-187.
Detail or employment of reporters and interpreters.

Under such regulations as the Governor may prescribe, the convening authority of a general or special court-martial, military commission, court of inquiry, or a military tribunal shall detail or employ qualified court reporters who shall record the proceedings of and testimony taken before that court, commission or tribunal. Under like regulations, the convening authority may detail or employ interpreters who shall interpret for the court, commission or tribunal.

HISTORY:
Former §33-13-213 [Codes, 1942, § 8529-29; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 29] repealed by Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 102, eff from and after July 1, 1981, amended and recodified as §33-13-187 by Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 31, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-189.
Absent and additional members.

No member of a general or special court-martial may be absent or excused after the court has been assembled for the trial of the accused except for physical disability or as the result of a challenge or by order of the convening authority for good cause.

Whenever a general court-martial, other than a general court-martial composed of a military judge only, is reduced below six (6) members, the trial may not proceed unless the convening authority details new members sufficient in number to provide not less than six (6) members. The trial may proceed with the new members present after the recorded evidence previously introduced has been read to the court in the presence of the military judge, the accused and counsel for both sides.

Whenever a special court-martial, other than a special court-martial composed of a military judge only, is reduced below three (3) members, the trial may not proceed unless the convening authority details new members sufficient in number to provide not less than three (3) members. The trial shall proceed with the new members present as if no evidence had previously been introduced at the trial, unless a verbatim record of the evidence previously introduced before the members of the court or a stipulation thereof is read to the court in the presence of the military judge, if any, the accused, and counsel for both sides.

If the military judge of a court-martial composed of a military judge only is unable to proceed with the trial because of physical disability, as a result of a challenge, or for other good cause, the trial shall proceed, subject to any applicable conditions of Section 33-13-151 of this code, after the detail of a new military judge as if no evidence had previously been introduced, unless a verbatim record of the evidence previously introduced or stipulation thereof is read in court in the presence of the new military judge, the accused, and counsel for both sides.

HISTORY:
Former §33-13-215 [Codes, 1942, § 8529-30; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 30] repealed by Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 102, eff from and after July 1, 1981, amended and recodified as §33-13-189 by Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 32, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§§ 33-13-201 through 33-13-215.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 102, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§33-13-201. [Codes, 1942, § 8529-23; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 23]

§33-13-203. [Codes, 1942, § 8529-24; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 24]

§33-13-205. [Codes, 1942, § 8529-25; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 25]

§33-13-207. [Codes, 1942, § 8529-26; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 26]

§33-13-209. [Codes, 1942, § 8529-27; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 27]

§33-13-211. [Codes, 1942, § 8529-28; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 28]

§33-13-213. [Codes, 1942, § 8529-29; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 29]

§33-13-215. [Codes, 1942, § 8529-30; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 30]